Utah statutes.
76-10-1313.   Sexual solicitation -- Penalty.

(1)  A person is guilty of sexual solicitation when:

(a)  he offers or agrees to commit any sexual activity with another person for a fee; or

(b)  he pays or offers or agrees to pay another person to commit any sexual activity for a fee.

(2)  Sexual solicitation is a class B misdemeanor.  However, any person who is convicted a second time, and on all subsequent convictions, under this section or under a local ordinance adopted in compliance with Section 76-10-1307, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except as provided in Section 76-10-1309.

